District of Columbia statutes.
4-516

Assessments.

(a)

In addition to and separate from punishment imposed, an assessment of $100 for each violation of § 50-2201.05, an assessment of between $50 and $250 for other serious traffic or misdemeanor offenses, and an assessment of between $100 and $5,000 for each felony offense shall be imposed upon each person convicted of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to the offense in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or any other court in which the offense is charged. The decision of the sentencing court regarding assessments is final. If an offender is indigent at the time of sentencing and is later employed for salary, receives compensation while on probation or parole, or is incarcerated in a facility of the Department of Corrections or elsewhere and receives wages or compensation therein, the amount of assessments under this section shall be paid from such salary, wages, or other compensation.

(b)

The probation office of the Court shall monitor collection of assessments levied against defendants released on probation. The Department of Corrections shall monitor collection of assessments levied against incarcerated defendants. The District of Columbia Board of Parole shall consider satisfaction of assessments under this section when determining release of inmates eligible for parole. If an inmate is released on parole prior to satisfaction of an assessment, the District of Columbia Board of Parole shall monitor collection of the balance due.

(c)

Assessments under this chapter shall be collected as fines. Failure to pay assessments as ordered by the Court will subject a defendant so ordered to sanctions provided pursuant to § 16-706.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 17, 44 DCR 1142

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-515.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-436.

Emergency Legislation

See note to § 4-501.